Hawaii statutes.
[§342L-4.5] Permits near shoreline
prohibited; exception. (a) The department shall not issue a permit for a
new underground fuel storage tank within one hundred yards of the shoreline;
provided that a permit may be issued by the department for purposes of
repairing or replacing an existing underground fuel storage tank.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection
(c), the holder of a permit for an existing underground fuel storage tank
within one hundred yards of the shoreline may renew the permit.

(c) Beginning January 1, 2045, no person
shall operate an underground fuel storage tank within one hundred yards of the
shoreline, and no permit for an underground fuel storage tank within one
hundred yards of the shoreline shall be renewed. [L 2016, c 179, §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next